dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX tG Y 50
SFX tG prendre prendre/25 prendre 21
SFX tG prendre prenant/25 prendre 22
SFX tG prendre pris/41 prendre 79
SFX tG prendre prise/41 prendre 25
SFX tG prendre prises/41 prendre 26
SFX tG prendre prends/26 prendre 27
SFX tG prendre prends/27 prendre 28
SFX tG prendre prend/28 prendre 29
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 30
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 31
SFX tG prendre prennent/28 prendre 32
SFX tG prendre prenais/26 prendre 33
SFX tG prendre prenais/27 prendre 34
SFX tG prendre prenait/28 prendre 35
SFX tG prendre prenions prendre 36
SFX tG prendre preniez prendre 37
SFX tG prendre prenaient/28 prendre 38
SFX tG prendre pris/26 prendre 39
SFX tG prendre pris/27 prendre 40
SFX tG prendre prit/28 prendre 41
SFX tG prendre prîmes prendre 42
SFX tG prendre prîtes prendre 43
SFX tG prendre prirent/28 prendre 44
SFX tG prendre prendrai/26 prendre 45
SFX tG prendre prendras/27 prendre 46
SFX tG prendre prendra/28 prendre 47
SFX tG prendre prendrons prendre 48
SFX tG prendre prendrez prendre 49
SFX tG prendre prendront/28 prendre 50
SFX tG prendre prendrais/26 prendre 51
SFX tG prendre prendrais/27 prendre 52
SFX tG prendre prendrait/28 prendre 53
SFX tG prendre prendrions prendre 54
SFX tG prendre prendriez prendre 55
SFX tG prendre prendraient/28 prendre 56
SFX tG prendre prenne/26 prendre 57
SFX tG prendre prennes/27 prendre 58
SFX tG prendre prenne/28 prendre 59
SFX tG prendre prenions prendre 60
SFX tG prendre preniez prendre 61
SFX tG prendre prennent/28 prendre 62
SFX tG prendre prisse/26 prendre 63
SFX tG prendre prisses/27 prendre 64
SFX tG prendre prît/28 prendre 65
SFX tG prendre prissions prendre 66
SFX tG prendre prissiez prendre 67
SFX tG prendre prissent/28 prendre 68
SFX tG prendre prends/27 prendre 69
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 70
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 71

SFX tM N 39
SFX tM outre outre foutre 21
SFX tM outre outant foutre 22
SFX tM outre outu foutre 23
SFX tM outre outus foutre 24
SFX tM outre outue foutre 25
SFX tM outre outues foutre 26
SFX tM outre ous foutre 27
SFX tM outre ous foutre 28
SFX tM outre out foutre 29
SFX tM outre outons foutre 30
SFX tM outre outez foutre 31
SFX tM outre outent foutre 32
SFX tM outre outais foutre 33
SFX tM outre outais foutre 34
SFX tM outre outait foutre 35
SFX tM outre outions foutre 36
SFX tM outre outiez foutre 37
SFX tM outre outaient foutre 38
SFX tM outre outrai foutre 45
SFX tM outre outras foutre 46
SFX tM outre outra foutre 47
SFX tM outre outrons foutre 48
SFX tM outre outrez foutre 49
SFX tM outre outront foutre 50
SFX tM outre outrais foutre 51
SFX tM outre outrais foutre 52
SFX tM outre outrait foutre 53
SFX tM outre outrions foutre 54
SFX tM outre outriez foutre 55
SFX tM outre outraient foutre 56
SFX tM outre oute foutre 57
SFX tM outre outes foutre 58
SFX tM outre oute foutre 59
SFX tM outre outions foutre 60
SFX tM outre outiez foutre 61
SFX tM outre outent foutre 62
SFX tM outre ous foutre 69
SFX tM outre outons foutre 70
SFX tM outre outez foutre 71

SFX tU N 5
SFX tU istre istre tistre 21
SFX tU istre issu tistre 23
SFX tU istre issue tistre 24
SFX tU istre issus tistre 25
SFX tU istre issues tistre 26

SFX uA Y 54
SFX uA tre tre/16 tre 21
SFX uA tre tant/17 tre 22
SFX uA tre tu/41 tre 23
SFX uA tre tus/41 tre 24
SFX uA tre tue/41 tre 25
SFX uA tre tues/41 tre 26
SFX uA ttre ts/9 ttre 27
SFX uA ttre ts/5 ttre 28
SFX uA ttre t/17 ttre 29
SFX uA tre ts/9 embatre 27
SFX uA tre ts/5 embatre 28
SFX uA tre t/17 embatre 29
SFX uA tre tons/7 tre 30
SFX uA tre tez/8 tre 31
SFX uA tre tent/17 tre 32
SFX uA tre tais/9 tre 33
SFX uA tre tais/5 tre 34
SFX uA tre tait/17 tre 35
SFX uA tre tions/7 tre 36
SFX uA tre tiez/8 tre 37
SFX uA tre taient/17 tre 38
SFX uA tre tis/9 tre 39
SFX uA tre tis/5 tre 40
SFX uA tre tit/17 tre 41
SFX uA tre tîmes/7 tre 42
SFX uA tre tîtes/8 tre 43
SFX uA tre tirent/17 tre 44
SFX uA tre trai/9 tre 45
SFX uA tre tras/5 tre 46
SFX uA tre tra/17 tre 47
SFX uA tre trons/7 tre 48
SFX uA tre trez/8 tre 49
SFX uA tre tront/17 tre 50
SFX uA tre trais/9 tre 51
SFX uA tre trais/5 tre 52
SFX uA tre trait/17 tre 53
SFX uA tre trions/7 tre 54
SFX uA tre triez/8 tre 55
SFX uA tre traient/17 tre 56
SFX uA tre te/11 tre 57
SFX uA tre tes/12 tre 58
SFX uA tre te/23 tre 59
SFX uA tre tions/13 tre 60
SFX uA tre tiez/14 tre 61
SFX uA tre tent/17 tre 62
SFX uA tre tisse/9 tre 63
SFX uA tre tisses/5 tre 64
SFX uA tre tît/17 tre 65
SFX uA tre tissions/7 tre 66
SFX uA tre tissiez/8 tre 67
SFX uA tre tissent/17 tre 68
SFX uA tre s/12 tre 69
SFX uA tre tons/24 tre 70
SFX uA tre tez/14 tre 71

SFX uC Y 51
SFX uC battre battre/25 battre 21
SFX uC battre battant/25 battre 22
SFX uC battre battu battre 23
SFX uC battre battus battre 24
SFX uC battre battue battre 25
SFX uC battre battues battre 26
SFX uC battre bats/26 battre 27
SFX uC battre bats/27 battre 28
SFX uC battre bat/28 battre 29
SFX uC battre battons battre 30
SFX uC battre battez battre 31
SFX uC battre battent/28 battre 32
SFX uC battre battais/26 battre 33
SFX uC battre battais/27 battre 34
SFX uC battre battait/28 battre 35
SFX uC battre battions battre 36
SFX uC battre battiez battre 37
SFX uC battre battaient/28 battre 38
SFX uC battre battis/26 battre 39
SFX uC battre battis/27 battre 40
SFX uC battre battit/28 battre 41
SFX uC battre battîmes battre 42
SFX uC battre battîtes battre 43
SFX uC battre battirent/28 battre 44
SFX uC battre battrai/26 battre 45
SFX uC battre battras/27 battre 46
SFX uC battre battra/28 battre 47
SFX uC battre battrons battre 48
SFX uC battre battrez battre 49
SFX uC battre battront/28 battre 50
SFX uC battre battrais/26 battre 51
SFX uC battre battrais/27 battre 52
SFX uC battre battrait/28 battre 53
SFX uC battre battrions battre 54
SFX uC battre battriez battre 55
SFX uC battre battraient/28 battre 56
SFX uC battre batte/26 battre 57
SFX uC battre battes/27 battre 58
SFX uC battre batte/28 battre 59
SFX uC battre battions battre 60
SFX uC battre battiez battre 61
SFX uC battre battent/28 battre 62
SFX uC battre battisse/26 battre 63
SFX uC battre battisses/27 battre 64
SFX uC battre battît/28 battre 65
SFX uC battre battissions battre 66
SFX uC battre battissiez battre 67
SFX uC battre battissent/28 battre 68
SFX uC battre bats/27 battre 69
SFX uC battre battons battre 70
SFX uC battre battez battre 71

SFX uD Y 36
SFX uD battre battre/28 battre 21
SFX uD battre battant/28 battre 22
SFX uD battre battu battre 23
SFX uD battre battus battre 24
SFX uD battre battue battre 25
SFX uD battre battues battre 26
SFX uD battre bat/28 battre 29
SFX uD battre battons battre 30
SFX uD battre battez battre 31
SFX uD battre battent/28 battre 32
SFX uD battre battait/28 battre 35
SFX uD battre battions battre 36
SFX uD battre battiez battre 37
SFX uD battre battaient/28 battre 38
SFX uD battre battit/28 battre 41
SFX uD battre battîmes battre 42
SFX uD battre battîtes battre 43
SFX uD battre battirent/28 battre 44
SFX uD battre battra/28 battre 47
SFX uD battre battrons battre 48
SFX uD battre battrez battre 49
SFX uD battre battront/28 battre 50
SFX uD battre battrait/28 battre 53
SFX uD battre battrions battre 54
SFX uD battre battriez battre 55
SFX uD battre battraient/28 battre 56
SFX uD battre batte/28 battre 59
SFX uD battre battions battre 60
SFX uD battre battiez battre 61
SFX uD battre battent/28 battre 62
SFX uD battre battît/28 battre 65
SFX uD battre battissions battre 66
SFX uD battre battissiez battre 67
SFX uD battre battissent/28 battre 68
SFX uD battre battons-nous battre 80
SFX uD battre battez-vous battre 81

SFX vA Y 50
SFX vA ettre ettre/16 mettre 21
SFX vA ettre ettant/17 mettre 22
SFX vA ettre is/41 mettre 79
SFX vA ettre ise/41 mettre 25
SFX vA ettre ises/41 mettre 26
SFX vA ettre ets/9 mettre 27
SFX vA ettre ets/5 mettre 28
SFX vA ettre et/17 mettre 29
SFX vA ettre ettons/7 mettre 30
SFX vA ettre ettez/8 mettre 31
SFX vA ettre ettent/17 mettre 32
SFX vA ettre ettais/9 mettre 33
SFX vA ettre ettais/5 mettre 34
SFX vA ettre ettait/17 mettre 35
SFX vA ettre ettions/7 mettre 36
SFX vA ettre ettiez/8 mettre 37
SFX vA ettre ettaient/17 mettre 38
SFX vA ettre is/9 mettre 39
SFX vA ettre is/5 mettre 40
SFX vA ettre it/17 mettre 41
SFX vA ettre îmes/7 mettre 42
SFX vA ettre îtes/8 mettre 43
SFX vA ettre irent/17 mettre 44
SFX vA ettre ettrai/9 mettre 45
SFX vA ettre ettras/5 mettre 46
SFX vA ettre ettra/17 mettre 47
SFX vA ettre ettrons/7 mettre 48
SFX vA ettre ettrez/8 mettre 49
SFX vA ettre ettront/17 mettre 50
SFX vA ettre ettrais/9 mettre 51
SFX vA ettre ettrais/5 mettre 52
SFX vA ettre ettrait/17 mettre 53
SFX vA ettre ettrions/7 mettre 54
SFX vA ettre ettriez/8 mettre 55
SFX vA ettre ettraient/17 mettre 56
SFX vA ettre ette/11 mettre 57
SFX vA ettre ettes/12 mettre 58
SFX vA ettre ette/23 mettre 59
SFX vA ettre ettions/13 mettre 60
SFX vA ettre ettiez/14 mettre 61
SFX vA ettre ettent/23 mettre 62
SFX vA ettre isse/9 mettre 63
SFX vA ettre isses/5 mettre 64
SFX vA ettre ît/17 mettre 65
SFX vA ettre issions/7 mettre 66
SFX vA ettre issiez/8 mettre 67
SFX vA ettre issent/17 mettre 68
SFX vA ettre ets/12 mettre 69
SFX vA ettre ettons/24 mettre 70
SFX vA ettre ettez/14 mettre 71

SFX vC Y 50
SFX vC mettre mettre/25 mettre 21
SFX vC mettre mettant/25 mettre 22
SFX vC mettre mis mettre 79
SFX vC mettre mise mettre 25
SFX vC mettre mises mettre 26
SFX vC mettre mets/26 mettre 27
SFX vC mettre mets/27 mettre 28
SFX vC mettre met/28 mettre 29
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre 30
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre 31
SFX vC mettre mettent/28 mettre 32
SFX vC mettre mettais/26 mettre 33
SFX vC mettre mettais/27 mettre 34
SFX vC mettre mettait/28 mettre 35
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre 36
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre 37
SFX vC mettre mettaient/28 mettre 38
SFX vC mettre mis/26 mettre 39
SFX vC mettre mis/27 mettre 40
SFX vC mettre mit/28 mettre 41
SFX vC mettre mîmes mettre 42
SFX vC mettre mîtes mettre 43
SFX vC mettre mirent/28 mettre 44
SFX vC mettre mettrai/26 mettre 45
SFX vC mettre mettras/27 mettre 46
SFX vC mettre mettra/28 mettre 47
SFX vC mettre mettrons mettre 48
SFX vC mettre mettrez mettre 49
SFX vC mettre mettront/28 mettre 50
SFX vC mettre mettrais/26 mettre 51
SFX vC mettre mettrais/27 mettre 52
SFX vC mettre mettrait/28 mettre 53
SFX vC mettre mettrions mettre 54
SFX vC mettre mettriez mettre 55
SFX vC mettre mettraient/28 mettre 56
SFX vC mettre mette/26 mettre 57
SFX vC mettre mettes/27 mettre 58
SFX vC mettre mette/28 mettre 59
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre 60
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre 61
SFX vC mettre mettent/28 mettre 62
SFX vC mettre misse/26 mettre 63
SFX vC mettre misses/27 mettre 64
SFX vC mettre mît/28 mettre 65
SFX vC mettre missions mettre 66
SFX vC mettre missiez mettre 67
SFX vC mettre missent/28 mettre 68
SFX vC mettre mets mettre 69
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre 70
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre 71
